Hawaii, session 2025, SB1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that teachers understand their students' needs and tailor their classrooms to create an engaging and effective learning experience.  Nationwide, teachers spend an average of $500 out-of-pocket on their classrooms each year. To alleviate the financial burden on teachers, the department of education is committed to providing funding for teacher-requested classroom supplies.  The legislature further finds that the department of education intends to engage in public-private partnerships focused on leveraging existing financial resources from both sectors to provide teachers and students with project-based resources. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of education for teacher-requested classroom supplies. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to provide funding for teacher-requested classroom supplies; provided that no state funds shall be expended unless the private sector contributes matching private funds on a dollar-for-dollar basis. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.